Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1710
Massage therapy license; applicant; qualifications.

Every applicant for an initial license to practice massage therapy shall (1) present satisfactory evidence that he or she has attained the age of nineteen years, (2) present proof of graduation from an approved massage therapy school, and (3) pass an examination prescribed by the board.

Laws 1955, c. 273, § 5, p. 863;

Laws 1957, c. 297, § 3, p. 1071;

Laws 1973, LB 512, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-2705;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 135;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 143;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,281;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 617.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.